Hawaii statutes.
§268-1 Ferry system and facilities
authorized. It being hereby declared that the establishment of a ferry
system to provide the people of this State with an economic means of
transportation is a public purpose, the department of transportation, hereinafter
referred to as the department, may acquire by lease, charter, contract,
purchase, condemnation, or construction, and partly by any or all of such
means, and thereafter operate, improve, and extend, as a public undertaking and
enterprise, a system of ferries between the islands of the State and connecting
with the public streets and highways in the State, the system of ferries to
include such boats, vessels, wharves, docks, approaches, landings, franchises,
licenses, and appurtenances, as shall be determined by the department to be
necessary or desirable for the efficient operation of a ferry system to best
serve the public. In general the department shall have all the powers
necessary or convenient to carry out effectively the purpose and provisions of this
chapter. The department may acquire by purchase, condemnation, or construction
and include in such ferry system such approaches and connecting roadways as may
be deemed by the department advantageous in channeling traffic to points served
by the ferry system. The department may enter into any contracts, agreements,
or leases with any person, firm, or corporation whether public or private and
thereby provide, on such terms and conditions as it shall determine, for the
operation of any ferry or ferries or system thereof, whether acquired by the
department or not. The department may further exercise the power of eminent
domain for the acquisition of either real or personal property, necessary for
the ferry system. [L 1963, c 186, §1; Supp, §114-1; HRS §268-1]

Cross References

Eminent domain, see chapter 101.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next